District of Columbia statutes.
34-407

Right to alter, amend, or repeal reserved.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal this subtitle.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 996, ch. 150, § 8, par. 103
General provisions, construction and severability of law, see § 34-403.
Separability clauses, see §§ 34-405 and 34-406.
1981 Ed., § 43-107.
1973 Ed., § 43-1007.